Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1079
Distribute, defined.

Distribute shall mean selling, exchanging, bartering, moving, or transporting; offering to sell, exchange, barter, move, or transport; holding nursery stock for sale, exchange, or barter; acting as a broker; or otherwise supplying. Distribute shall not include moving or transporting on contiguous real estate that is owned, leased, or controlled by the same person.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 7.